Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1807
Award of fees and expenses against state; proceedings to which applicable.

Sections 25-1802 to 25-1807 shall apply only to legal and administrative proceedings initiated after July 17, 1982.

Laws 1982, LB 192, § 6.